Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-815
Judicial officeholder; request to be retained; Secretary of State; submit to electorate; form of ballot.

Upon receipt of such information and request within the time provided in section 24-814, the Secretary of State shall cause the question of said judicial officeholder's right to continue in office for an additional term to be submitted to the appropriate electorate at the next general election, on the nonpolitical ballot. Said question shall be submitted in substance as follows: "Shall Judge ......................... be retained in office? .... Yes .... No".

Laws 1963, c. 125, § 3, p. 478.